Arkansas, session 2025, HB1984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-913(a), concerning a disclosure of a
person's status as a registered sex offender, is amended to add an additional
subdivision read as follows:
(4) Registration records shall be open to the Office of Motor
Vehicle of the Department of Finance and Administration for the issuance of a
driver's license or identification card to a registered sex offender under §
27-16-819.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-16-819. Designation for registered sex offender.
(a)(1) Before the Office of Driver Services issues a driver's license
or identification card to an applicant, the applicant shall provide
*ZRC131*
04/03/2025 11:15:49 AM ZRC131

HB1984
information to the office concerning whether the applicant is:
(A) Required to register as a sex offender under the Sex
Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.;
(B) Currently registered as a sex offender under the Sex
Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq.; and
(C) Classified as a Level 3 or Level 4 sex offender by the
Community Notification Assessment.
(2) The office shall place a designation on an applicant's
driver's license or identification card sufficient to enable a law
enforcement officer to identify the holder of the driver's license or
identification card as a registered sex offender subject to the Sex Offender
Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq., if the applicant is:
(A) Required to register as a sex offender; and
(B) Classified as a Level 3 or Level 4 sex offender by the
Community Notification Assessment.
(3) Before the office issues a driver's license or
identification card to an applicant who is required to have a designation
placed on his or her driver's license or identification card under this
section and who has not previously had a designation placed on his or her
driver's license or identification card under this section, the applicant
shall provide proof to the office that the applicant is registered as a sex
offender in compliance with the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-
12-901 et seq.
(b) The office may:
(1) Determine the appropriate placement and design of the
registered sex offender designation on a driver's license or identification
card authorized under this section; and
(2) Promulgate rules for the administration of this section.








04/03/2025 11:15:49 AM ZRC131